Tennessee, session 114, SB1387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-803, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The state shall grant an amount as provided in this part to Tennessee resident
students enrolled at independent, nonprofit colleges and universities accredited by the
College Commission of the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools and, to the
extent feasible within existing budgetary resources of the Tennessee student assistance
corporation, to Tennessee resident students enrolled at eligible independent
postsecondary institutions, as defined in § 49-4-902(11)(C), and private nonprofit
postsecondary institutions that:
(1) Have established a partnership with this state pursuant to a
memorandum of understanding executed in 2013;
(2) Are accredited by a regional accrediting association;
(3) Use a competency-based model of education;
(4) Have established and continuously maintain a physical campus or
location of operation within this state;
(5) Maintain a governing body or advisory board based in this state with
oversight of operations in this state; and
(6) Have been chartered in this state as a nonprofit entity for at least five
(5) consecutive years.
SB1387
001318
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001318